test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_mielgas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Noun - mielgâs+v2: 
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: mieˊlgâsân
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: mieˊlgâsist
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: mieˊlgâsáin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: mielˊgâsttáá
    mielgâs+v2+N+Ess: mieˊlgâsin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Par: mieˊlgâsid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: mieˊlgâseh
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: mieˊlgâsij
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: mieˊlgâsijd
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: mieˊlgâsáid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: mieˊlgâsijn
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: mieˊlgâsijguin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: mieˊlgâsijttáá


  Noun - ruonâs+v2: 
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: ruoˊṇâsân
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: ruoˊṇâsist
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: ruoˊṇâsáin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: ruonˊnâsttáá
    ruonâs+v2+N+Ess: ruoˊṇâsin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Par: ruoˊṇâsid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: ruoˊṇâseh
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: ruoˊṇâsij
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: ruoˊṇâsijd
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: ruoˊṇâsáid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: ruoˊṇâsijn
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: ruoˊṇâsijguin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: ruoˊṇâsijttáá

  Noun - kuálus: # ok, MLO 
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuáḷus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: kuálˊlusân
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuálˊlusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuálˊlusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuálˊlusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess:    kuáˊḷusin
    kuálus+N+Par:    kuáˊḷusid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: kuálˊluseh
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: kuálˊlusij
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuálˊlusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuálˊlusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuálˊlusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: kuálˊlusijguin
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuálˊlusijttáá

  Noun - suormâs+v2: 
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: suoˊrmâsân
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: suoˊrmâsist
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: suoˊrmâsáin
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: suorˊmâsttáá
    suormâs+v2+N+Ess: suoˊrmâsin
    suormâs+v2+N+Par: suoˊrmâsid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: suoˊrmâseh
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: suoˊrmâsij
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: suoˊrmâsijd
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: suoˊrmâsáid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: suoˊrmâsijn
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: suoˊrmâsijguin
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊrmâsijttáá

  Noun - siärvus+v2: 
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Gen: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Acc: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Ill: siäˊrvusân
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Loc: siäˊrvusist
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Com: siäˊrvusáin
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Abe: siärˊvusttáá
    siärvus+v2+N+Ess: siäˊrvusin
    siärvus+v2+N+Par: siäˊrvusid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Nom: siäˊrvuseh
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Gen: siäˊrvusij
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Acc: siäˊrvusijd
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Ill: siäˊrvusáid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Loc: siäˊrvusijn
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Com: siäˊrvusijguin
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Abe: siäˊrvusijttáá
